Massachusetts, session 194th, H4105.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 55 of chapter 23K of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection ( c ), the phrase “9 per cent”
and replacing it with the following: “.5 per cent”.
SECTION 2. Section 55 of said chapter 23K of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by adding, at the end of subsection (c), after the phrase “section 60”, the
following: “and 8.5 percent of its daily gross gaming revenue to the Healthy Incentives Program
under the Department of Transitional Assistance.”
SECTION 3. Section 59 of chapter 23K of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection (2)(l), the phrase “2.5 per cent”
and replacing it with the following: “.2 per cent”.
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 59 of said chapter 23K of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by adding at the end a new subsection: “(2)(m) 2.3 per cent to the
Healthy Incentives Program under the Department of Transitional Assistance.”
SECTION 5. Of the funds currently in any of the accounts of the Race Horse
Development Fund, as described in section 60 of chapter 23K, $10 million shall be transferred
immediately to the Healthy Incentives Program under the Department of Transitional Assistance
(“HIP”). The remainder of such funds shall be immediately transferred to the Community
Preservation Trust Fund established in section 9 of chapter 44B of the General Laws.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding section 60 of chapter 23K, after such transfers as
provided above in SECTION 5, any further funds paid into the Race Horse Development Fund,
as provided in sections 2 and 4 above, shall be used exclusively for health and pension benefits
of all currently retired or permanently disabled former jockeys, former drivers, and former
Suffolk Downs “backstretch” workers (grooms and other barn workers). The Massachusetts
Gaming Commission shall use the same general standards it currently uses to determine
eligibility for disabled or retired jockeys to determine eligibility of retired or disabled former
Suffolk Downs Backstretch Workers for health and welfare benefits.
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2